test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lookk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - lookki contract stem lukija: # Noun - full paradigm
     lookki+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: lookki
     lookki+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: looǥǥi
     lookki+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: looǥǥi
     lookki+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: lookkja
     lookki+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: lookkjest
     lookki+N+Sg+Com+Indef: looǥǥin
     lookki+N+Ess+Indef: lookkjen
     lookki+N+Par+Indef: lookkjed
     lookki+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [looǥǥitaa, looǥǥitää]
     lookki+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: looǥǥi
     lookki+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: looǥǥji
     lookki+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: looǥǥjid
     lookki+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: looǥǥjid
     lookki+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: looǥǥjin
     lookki+N+Pl+Com+Indef: looǥǥjivuiʹm
     lookki+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [looǥǥjitaa, looǥǥjitää]
     
